Wisconsin, session 2025, SB162.
do enact as follows:SB162,15Section 1. 985.065 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB162,2,91985.065 (2) (a) In counties having a population of 250,000 or more and that 2have at least 2 English newspapers published daily, the county board of 3supervisors, at its annual meeting shall direct the county clerk to invite proposals 4from the English newspapers published daily in said county, for the publication and 5printing of the proceedings of said board, and all other notices or advertisements as 6shall be authorized or required to be published or printed by the said board and all 7officers, boards and departments of said county, during the next ensuing year, 8which publications and advertising may be divided and classified if the said board 9shall so order.SB162,2,1010